Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2671.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Licensed certified lactation counselor -- Medicaid coverage.
(a) As used in this section, “licensed certified lactation counselor” means a trained
professional who holds a licensure and certification by the department of health in accordance with
chapter 13.8 of title 23. Licensed certified lactation counselors provide services in assessment,
evaluation, problem identification, treatment, education, and consultation to provide lactation care
and services to childbearing families, and infant children from birth to twelve (12) months old
within the scope of practice pursuant to § 23-13.8-9.
(b) The executive office of health and human services (“EOHHS”) shall provide coverage
under the Medicaid program for services provided by a licensed certified lactation counselor, when
such services are within the counselor’s lawful scope of practice and are otherwise eligible for
coverage under the Medicaid state plan or a waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services.
(c) Reimbursement for services provided by a licensed certified lactation counselor shall
be made in accordance with Medicaid reimbursement principles and methodologies applicable to
other maternal and child health providers for comparable services. No requirement for physician or
other provider supervision, signature, or referral shall be imposed unless such requirement is
imposed on other providers for the same service.

(d) The EOHHS shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this section
including, but not limited to, credentialing and enrollment requirements for licensed certified
lactation counselors participating as Medicaid providers.
(e) On or before July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the EOHHS shall collect and
maintain data on utilization and expenditures related to services provided by licensed certified
lactation counselors to Medicaid beneficiaries.
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unless otherwise specified,
the provisions of this section shall supersede and shall control over any conflicting or inconsistent
laws, including general laws, special laws, or local laws, or any rule or regulation of the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005544
========
LC005544 - Page 2 of 3